Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.130

Withdrawal of charter amendment or conversion application.

The directors of an association which has voted to amend its charter or convert to another type of institution, may withdraw the application at any time prior to the issuance of the amended charter, by adopting a proper resolution and forwarding a copy to the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 480; 1955 c 122 s 14.]